District of Columbia statutes.
38-603

Exemption for religious beliefs.

Certificates of health, testing for lead poisoning and dental health shall not be required under this subchapter, and no physical, lead poisoning or dental examination shall be required by the Mayor, if a minor student’s parent or guardian or an adult student submits in good faith a written notarized statement to the principal or other appropriate school official affirming that the examination(s) in question would violate the established tenets and practices of the parent’s, guardian’s or student’s church or religious denomination.

History

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-66, § 4, 32 DCR 6086
Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-29, § 2(d), 40 DCR 5752

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-602.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2403.